West Virginia, session 2026, HB5358.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2A. WEST VIRGINIA COMMISSIONER OF HIGHWAYS. §17-2A-4c. Authorize incremented pay to certain Division of Highways employees. (a) The commissioner is authorized to designate localities within the state as ones where offering higher wages is necessary to recruit and retain employees in a competitive manner. Any pay differential provided pursuant to this section may exceed the maximum salary range established for the position classification. The commissioner shall promulgate a policy directive that establishes rules for implementation of this section. (b) An employee of the Division of Highways working in an area designated by the commissioner as one where locality pay is necessary for maintaining the division’s ability to recruit and retain employees in a competitive manner, may receive a locality pay differential not to exceed $10,000 per year in addition to the personnel’s regular salary or hourly pay.